Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.200

Annual salary schedules as basis for salaries of certificated employees.

Every school district by action of its board of directors shall adopt annual salary schedules and reproduce the same by printing, mimeographing or other reasonable method, which shall be the basis for salaries for all certificated employees in the district.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.67.066, 28.67.066.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.